Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.120

Legislative records—"Clerk," "secretary" defined.

As used in RCW 40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180 "clerk" means clerk of the Washington state house of representatives and "secretary" means the secretary of the Washington state senate.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 4.]